District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.13

Effect of possession of certificate of title; judicial process.

Possession of a certificate of title does not by itself provide a right to obtain possession of a vessel. Garnishment, attachment, levy, replevin, or other judicial process against the certificate of title is not effective to determine possessory rights to the vessel. This chapter does not prohibit enforcement under law of the District other than this chapter of a security interest in, levy on, or foreclosure of a statutory or common-law lien on a vessel. Absence of an indication of a statutory or common-law lien on a certificate of title does not invalidate the lien.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 14, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.